src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Võru tags and basic lexica

# Definitions for Multichar_Symbols

## Analysis symbols
The morphological analyses of wordforms for the Võro
language are presented in this system in terms of the following symbols.
(It is highly suggested to follow existing standards when adding new tags).

* **+WORK** (eng) work needed 
* __b́__ b plus U+0301 COMBINING ACUTE
* __d́__ d plus U+0301 COMBINING ACUTE
* __f́__ f plus U+0301 COMBINING ACUTE
* __h́__ h plus U+0301 COMBINING ACUTE
* __t́__ t plus U+0301 COMBINING ACUTE
* __v́__ v plus U+0301 COMBINING ACUTE
* __B́__ B plus U+0301 COMBINING ACUTE
* __D́__ D plus U+0301 COMBINING ACUTE
* __F́__ F plus U+0301 COMBINING ACUTE
* __H́__ H plus U+0301 COMBINING ACUTE
* __T́__ T plus U+0301 COMBINING ACUTE
* __V́__ V plus U+0301 COMBINING ACUTE

* **u̬** u plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
* **U̬** u plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
* **ü̬** ü plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
* **Ü̬** ü plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
* **i̬** i plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
* **I̬** i plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
* **õ̭** õ plus U+032D COMBINING CIRCUMFLEX ACCENT BELOW
* **Õ̭** õ plus U+032D COMBINING CIRCUMFLEX ACCENT BELOW
```%{ˋØ%} - U+02CB MODIFIER LETTER GRAVE ACCENT used in rules```

The parts-of-speech are:
* **+N** Noun
* **+A** Adjective
* **+Adv** Adverb
* **+V** Verb

* **+Pron** Pronoun
* **+CS** subjunction
* **+CC** Correlating conjunction
* **+Det** Determiners
* **+Adp** Adpositions
* **+Po** Postposition
* **+Pr** Preposition
* **+Interj** Interjections
* **+Pcle**
* **+Num** Numerals
* **+Qnt**

The parts of speech are further split up into:

* **+Prop**
* **+Pers**
* **+Dem**
* **+Interr**
* **+Refl**
* **+Recipr**
* **+Rel**
* **+Indef**
* **+Deg** adjective or adverb modifier. This is degree, depricate + AdA

The Usage extents are marked using following tags:
* **+Err/Orth**
* **+Err/Orth-dAq-should-be-q-inf** hirnahtadaq should be hirnahtaq
* **+Err/Orth-no-pal** palatalization is missing
* **+Err/Orth-no-q** Q is missing
* **+Err/Orth-raised-vow** 
* **+Err/Orth-lowered-vow** 
* **+Err/Orth-e-stem** should be i stem, but is e stem
* **+Err/Orth-o-stem** should be u stem, but is o stem
* **+Err/Orth-u-stem** should be o stem, but is u stem
* **+Err/Orth-est** 
* **+Err/Orth-weak-grade**
* **+Err/Orth-back** erroneous back harmony, see flags
* **+Err/Orth-front** erroneous front harmony, see flags
* **+Err/Dial** This is the initial Dialect distinction
it will require further work from a professional, i.e., Sullõv or like for
distinguishing dialects.
* **+Dial/-u-not-o** dialect u stem where o expected
* **+Use/-Spell**
* **+Use/SpellNoSugg** not suggested in speller
* **+Use/NG** No generation
* **+Use/Circ100** 
* **+Cmp/Hyph** 
* **+Use/PMatch**
* **+Use/TTS** – **only** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser
* **+Use/-TTS** – **never** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser

The nominals are inflected in the following Case and Number
* **+Sg** Singular
* **+Pl** Plural
* **+SP** Singular and Plural, used for CG and Apertium

* **+Abe** abessive
* **+Abl** ablative
* **+Acc** accusative
* **+Ade** adessive
* **+All** allative
* **+Com** comitative
* **+Com/Sh**
* **+Ela** elative
* **+Ess** essive
* **+Ill** illative
* **+Ine** inessive
* **+Gen** genitive
* **+Loc** locative
* **+Nom** nominative
* **+Par** partitive
* **+Ter** terminative
* **+Tra** translative

The possession is marked as such:
There are no possessive markers

The comparative forms are:
* **+Comp**
* **+Superl**
Numerals are classified under:
* **+Attr**
* **+Card**
* **+Ord**
* **+Arab**
Verb moods are:
* **+Cond**
* **+Imprt**
* **+Ind**
* **+Jus**
* **+Prs**
* **+Prt**
* **+Pot**
* **+Quo** = quotative, quoted speech

Verb personal forms are:

Subject conjugation

* **+Sg1**
* **+Sg2**
* **+Sg3**
* **+Pl1**
* **+Pl2**
* **+Pl3**

* **+ScSg1**
* **+ScSg2**
* **+ScSg3**
* **+ScPl1**
* **+ScPl2**
* **+ScPl3**
* **+Sc**

Passive conjugation

* **+PcSg1**
* **+PcSg2**
* **+PcSg3**
* **+PcPl1**
* **+PcPl2**
* **+PcPl3**
* **+Pc**
Other verb forms are
* **+Inf** sõimadaq, elädäq
* **+Inf/mA** sõimama, elämä
* **+Ger** ollõn
* **+ConNeg** saa eiq 3 elements in 2 orthographic units
* **+ConNegII** ei saaq 3 elements in 2 orthographic units
* **+Neg** saa-aiq 3 elements in 1 orthographic unit
* **+ImprtII**
* **+PrsPrc**
* **+PrfPrc**
* **+Sup** olõman, olõmaldaq; oldama
* **+VGen**
* **+VAbess**
* **+Act** active
* **+Pss** passive
* **+PrsPrc**
* **+PrfPrc** elet

* **+ABBR**
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©
* **+ACR**
* **+Acro**

Special symbols are classified with:
* **+CLB**
* **+CLBfinal**
* **+PUNCT**
* **+LEFT**
* **+RIGHT +MIDDLE**
The verbs are syntactically split according to transitivity:
* **+TV**
* **+IV**
Special multiword units are analysed with:
* **+Multi**
Non-dictionary words can be recognised with:
* **+Guess**

Question and Focus particles:

* **+Qst**
* **+Foc**
* **+Clt**

* **+Hom1**
* **+Hom2**
* **+Hom3**
* **+Hom4**

### Tags distinguishing different versions of the same lemma (before POS)
* +v1
* +v2
* +v3
* +v4
* +v5
* +v6
* +v7
* +v8
* +v9
* +v10
* +v11
* +v12
* +v13
* +v14
* +v15
* +v16
* +v17
* +v18
* +v19
* +v20
* +v21
* +v22
* +v23
* +v24

* **+Sem/ID** used with numerals 2023_04_04

* **+Sem/Act** Activity
* **+Sem/Amount** Amount
* **+Sem/Ani** Animate
* **+Sem/Aniprod** Animal Product
* **+Sem/Body** Bodypart
* **+Sem/Body-abstr** siellu, vuoig?a, jierbmi
* **+Sem/Build** Building
* **+Sem/Build-part** Part of Bulding, like the closet
* **+Sem/Cat** Category
* **+Sem/Clth** Clothes
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl** Jewelery
* **+Sem/Clth-part** part of clothes, boallu, sávdnji...
* **+Sem/Ctain** Container
* **+Sem/Ctain-abstr** Abstract container like bank account
* **+Sem/Ctain-clth**
* **+Sem/Curr** Currency like dollár, Not Money
* **+Sem/Dance** Dance
* **+Sem/Dir** Direction like GPS-kursa
* **+Sem/Domain** Domain like politics, reindeerherding (a system of actions)
* **+Sem/Drink** Drink
* **+Sem/Dummytag** Dummytag
* **+Sem/Edu** Educational event
* **+Sem/Event** Event
* **+Sem/Feat** Feature, like Árvu
* **+Sem/Feat-phys** Physiological feature, ivdni, fárda
* **+Sem/Feat-psych** Psychological feauture
* **+Sem/Feat-measr** Psychological feauture
* **+Sem/Fem** Female name
* **+Sem/Food** Food
* **+Sem/Food-med** Medicine
* **+Sem/Furn** Furniture
* **+Sem/Game** Game
* **+Sem/Geom** Geometrical object
* **+Sem/Group** Animal or Human Group
* **+Sem/Hum** Human
* **+Sem/Hum-abstr** Human abstract
* **+Sem/Ideol** Ideology
* **+Sem/Lang** Language
* **+Sem/Mal** Male name
* **+Sem/Mat** Material for producing things
* **+Sem/Measr** Measure
* **+Sem/Money** Has to do with money, like wages, not Curr(ency)
* **+Sem/Obj** Object
* **+Sem/Obj-clo** Cloth
* **+Sem/Obj-cogn** Cloth
* **+Sem/Obj-el** (Electrical) machine or apparatus
* **+Sem/Obj-ling** Object with something written on it
* **+Sem/Obj-rope** flexible ropelike object
* **+Sem/Obj-surfc** Surface object
* **+Sem/Org** Organisation
* **+Sem/Part** Feature, oassi, bealli
* **+Sem/Perc-cogn** Cognative perception
* **+Sem/Perc-emo** Emotional perception
* **+Sem/Perc-phys** Physical perception
* **+Sem/Perc-psych** Physical perception
* **+Sem/Plant** Plant
* **+Sem/Plant-part** Plant part
* **+Sem/Plc** Place
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr** Abstract place
* **+Sem/Plc-elevate** Place
* **+Sem/Plc-line** Place
* **+Sem/Plc-water** Place
* **+Sem/Pos** Position (as in social position job)
* **+Sem/Process** Process
* **+Sem/Prod** Product
* **+Sem/Prod-audio** Audio product
* **+Sem/Prod-cogn** Cognition product
* **+Sem/Prod-ling** Linguistic product
* **+Sem/Prod-vis** Visual product
* **+Sem/Rel** Relation
* **+Sem/Route** Name of a Route
* **+Sem/Rule** Rule or convention
* **+Sem/Semcon** Semantic concept
* **+Sem/Sign** Sign (e.g. numbers, punctuation) 
* **+Sem/Sport** Sport
* **+Sem/State** 
* **+Sem/State-sick** Illness
* **+Sem/Substnc** Substance, like Air and Water
* **+Sem/Sur** Surname
* **+Sem/Symbol** Symbol
* **+Sem/Time** Time
* **+Sem/Tool** Prototypical tool for repairing things
* **+Sem/Tool-catch** Tool used for catching (e.g. fish)
* **+Sem/Tool-clean** Tool used for cleaning
* **+Sem/Tool-it** Tool used in IT
* **+Sem/Tool-measr** Tool used for measuring
* **+Sem/Tool-music** Music instrument
* **+Sem/Tool-write** Writing tool
* **+Sem/Txt** Text (girji, lávlla...)
* **+Sem/Veh** Vehicle
* **+Sem/Wpn** Weapon
* **+Sem/Wthr** The Weather or the state of ground
* **+Sem/Year** 

* **+Sem/Ant_Fem**
* **+Sem/Ant_Mal**
* **+Temp**

Derivations are classified under the morphophonetic form of the suffix, the
source and target part-of-speech.
* **+V→N**
* **+V→V**
* **+V→A**
* **+Prop→A**
* **+Der**
* **+Der/xxx**
** +Der/JA **	NomAg
** +Der/minE ** NomAct
** +Der/Us   ** A→N
**+Der/lt	   ** A→Adv

# Morphophonology
To represent phonologic variations in word forms we use the following
symbols in the lexicon files:
```
 %{aä%}    — Vowel harmony with "(t)a/ä" AÄ1:a AÄ1:ä AÄ1:0
 %{ae%}   — Vowel harmony with "a/e/õ" passive tahetu
 %{aõ%}   — Vowel harmony with "a/e/õ" passive sõidõtu
 %{äe%}    — Vowel harmony with "ä/e/õ" passive
 %{eõ%}    — Vowel harmony with "e/õ"
 %{uü%}    — Vowel harmony with "u/ü"
 %{öü%}    — Vowel raising
 %{ou%}    — Vowel raising
 %{ei%}    — Vowel raising
 %{õy%}    — Vowel raising
 %{ao%}    — Vowel raising
 %{eØ%}    — ütlemä:üt%{eØ%}l  
 %{õØ%}    — ütlemä:üt%{eØ%}l  
 %{Øõ%}    — juurdlõma:juur%{dØ%}%{0õ%}l
 %{XV%}    — This is used for echoing the previous vowel
 %{XC%}    — This is used for lengthening a consonant
 %{dØ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{tØ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{t́Ø%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas jaht́lõma:jah%{t́Ø%}%{eØ%}%{lĺ%}
 %{dv%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{ij%}    ellä%{ij%}
 %{gv%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{gl%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{gØ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas argnõma:ar%{gØ%}
 %{uv%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{üv%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
```

## Gemination
```
 %{hØ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{jØ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kØ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{lØ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{mØ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{nØ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{pØ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas oppama:o%{pØ%}pama
 %{rØ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{sØ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{vØ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{Øp%}    — häbü:hä%{Øp%}%{pbØ%}ü
 %{Øt%}    — koda:ko%{Øt%}%{tdØ%}a
 %{Øk%}    — nägo:nä%{Øk%}%{kgØ%}o

```

## Strong and weak
```
 %{pb%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{td%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{t́d́%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kg%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{bv%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas närväs:när%{bv%}ä%{sØ%}
 %{dr%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas parras:par%{dr%}a%{sØ%}
 %{bm%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas lammas:lam%{bm%}a%{sØ%}
 %{dn%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas lammas:lam%{bm%}a%{sØ%}
 %{dl%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas lammas:lam%{bm%}a%{sØ%}
 %{pbØ%}   — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{pbv%}   — tõbi: tõvõ tõpõ tõppõ
 %{tdØ%}   — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kgØ%}   — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{jiØ%}   — HJK and KimmoK ideas vari:var%{jiØ%}o
 %{qmn%}   — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{qn%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{dd́Ø%}   
 %{dd́n%}   
 %{dd́r%}   
 %{dd́v%}   
 %{dd́Ø%}   
 %{gǵv%}   
 %{gǵØ%}   
 %{tt́d%}   
 %{tt́Ø%}    täh%{tt́Ø%}
 %{kḱg%}   
 %{kḱØ%}   
 %{pṕb%}   
 %{pṕØ%}   

 %{dśtv%}    tä%{üv%}%{śtv%}
 %{djśt%}    vii%{jśt%}
 %{drśt%}    var%{rśt%}

```
